Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2560.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; HISTORIC WASHINGTON BALL FIELD AND GRANDSTAND.new text end new text begin $1,400,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to the city of Detroit Lakes to renovate the historic Washington Ball Field and grandstand. new text end